Utah statutes.
31A-23a-808.   Examination authority.

(1)  A reinsurance intermediary shall be subject to examination by the commissioner.  The commissioner shall have access to all books, bank accounts, and records of the reinsurance intermediary, which shall be kept in a form usable to the commissioner.

(2)  A reinsurance intermediary-manager may be examined as if it were the reinsurer.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 298, 2003 General Session

